Washington statutes.
RCW 19.240.900

Application—2004 c 168 ss 1-12.

Sections 1 through 12 of this act apply to:

(1) Gift certificates issued on or after July 1, 2004; and

(2) Those gift certificates presumed abandoned on or after July 1, 2004, and not reported as provided in chapter 63.30 RCW.

[ 2023 c 258 s 5; 2004 c 168 s 18.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2023 c 258 ss 2-8, 10, and 11: See note following RCW 19.150.060.